Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1031.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6501(b)(1), (2), (3) and (4) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6501. Scattering rubbish.* * *(b) Penalty.--(1) A person who violates subsection (a)(1) or (2) is guilty of a summary offense for the first offense and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $50 nor more than [$300] $2,000 and be required to pick up litter or illegally dumped trash for not less than five nor more than 30 hours to be completed within six months, or to imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.123456789101112131415161718 (2) A person who violates subsection (a)(1) or (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree for the second and subsequent offense and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $300 nor more than [$1,000] $5,000. The person also may be sentenced to imprisonment or be required to pick up litter or illegally dumped trash for not less than 30 nor more than 100 hours to be completed within one year.(3) A person who violates subsection (a)(3) is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree for the first offense and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500 nor more than [$5,000] $10,000. The person also may be sentenced to imprisonment or to performing a community service for a period not to exceed two years.(4) A person who violates subsection (a)(3) is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree for the second or subsequent offense and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than [$10,000] $20,000. The person also may be sentenced to imprisonment or to performing a community service for a period not to exceed five years.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1031PN1111 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223